District of Columbia statutes.
34-2410.06

Limitations on responsibility for maintenance, repair, and replacement of private fire hydrants.

(a)

This subchapter establishes responsibility for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of private fire hydrants that had been permitted prior to October 8, 2009. If this responsibility belongs to the District government, pursuant to this subchapter, the cost to effect the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a the fire hydrant shall be subject to the availability of appropriations.

(b)

The responsibility for conducting and notifying owners of the results of a title search, and the inspection, of the private fire hydrants as required by this subchapter, shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-337, § 7, 58 DCR 609
The Budget Director of the Council of the District of Columbia has determined, as of February 15, 2012, that the fiscal effect of Law 18-337 has not been included in an approved budget and financial plan as required by subsection (b) of this section. That determination, however, does not affect the codification of this section.